Wisconsin, session 2025, AB582.
do enact as follows:AB582,1Section 1. 15.227 (16) of the statutes is created to read:15.227 (16) Council on dual enrollment. There is created in the department of workforce development a council on dual enrollment consisting of all of the following members, appointed for 3-year terms:(a) Two members appointed by the president of the University of Wisconsin System.(b) Two members appointed by the director of the technical college system.(c) Two members appointed by the state superintendent of public instruction.(d) Two members appointed by the president of the Wisconsin Association of Independent Colleges and Universities.(e) One member appointed by the speaker of the assembly.(f) One member appointed by the senate majority leader.(g) One member who is a school district administrator appointed by the joint committee on legislative organization.(h) One member who represents tribal colleges in this state.(i) One member who is a school board member appointed by the executive director of the Wisconsin Association of School Boards(j) One member appointed by the board of directors of the Wisconsin Council of Religious and Independent Schools.AB582,2Section 2. 36.11 (3) (b) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, is amended to read:36.11 (3) (b) Subject to s. 36.31 (2m), the board shall establish policies for the appropriate transfer of credits between institutions within the system, including postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil enrolled in a course at an institution within the system under the program under s. 118.55. If the board determines that postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil under the program under s. 118.55 are not transferable under this paragraph, the board shall permit the individual to take an examination to determine the individual’s competency in the subject area of the course and, if the individual receives a passing score on the examination, shall award equivalent credits to the individual. The board’s policies under this paragraph shall provide that, no later than September 1, 2026, all credits for core general education courses, as defined in s. 36.31 (2m) (a) 2., including postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil through the program under s. 118.55 for completion of a core general education course, are transferable between institutions within the system and satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution. No later than December 31, 2025, the board shall submit a proposal to the joint committee on employment relations related to the transfer policies.AB582,3Section 3. 36.11 (3) (cm) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:36.11 (3) (cm) 5. Core general education courses that are subject to the agreement agreements required under s. 36.31 (2m) (b) and (bm).AB582,4Section 4. 36.31 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:36.31 (2m) (b) Notwithstanding s. 36.09 (3) (a), the Board of Regents and the technical college system board shall, and the governing boards of tribally controlled colleges in this state and the association, on behalf of private colleges, may, enter into and implement an agreement that identifies an array of not less than 72 credits of core general education courses and establishes policies for ensuring that, beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, credits for completing the courses are transferable and would satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution or college, between and within each institution and technical college, and each tribally controlled college and private college that elects to participate in the agreement. Beginning in the 2027-28 academic year, the agreement shall ensure that postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil through the program under s. 38.12 (14) for completion of a core general education course included in the agreement are transferable and satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution, technical college, or participating tribal college.AB582,5Section 5. 36.31 (2m) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:36.31 (2m) (bm) Notwithstanding s. 36.09 (3) (a), the Board of Regents and the association, on behalf of private colleges, shall enter into and implement an agreement that identifies an array of not less than 36 credits of core general education courses and establishes policies for ensuring that, beginning in the 2027-28 academic year, credits for completing the courses are transferable and would satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution or at the receiving private college that chooses to participate in the agreement. Notwithstanding s. 36.11 (3) (c), the agreement shall ensure that postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil through the program under s. 118.55 for completion of a core general education course included in the agreement are transferable and satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution or at the receiving private college that chooses to participate in the agreement. A private college may exclude from application of the agreement any course that does not align with an institutional religious or professional pathway requirement.AB582,6Section 6. 36.31 (2m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:36.31 (2m) (c) The Board of Regents and the technical college system board shall ensure that the governing bodies of tribally controlled colleges and the association, on behalf of private colleges, have an opportunity to elect to participate in the agreements specified in pars. par. (am) and (b). The Board of Regents and the technical college system board shall ensure that the governing bodies of tribally controlled colleges have an opportunity to elect to participate in the agreement specified in par. (b). AB582,7Section 7. 36.31 (2m) (d) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, is amended to read:36.31 (2m) (d) Notwithstanding pars. (am) 1. and, (b), and (bm), no agreement under this subsection may limit the transfer of credits for core general education courses between institutions within the system.AB582,8Section 8. 36.65 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:36.65 (3) Core general education credit transfers. The board shall include in the report required under sub. (2) a description of the agreement agreements entered into under s. 36.31 (2m) (b) and (bm) and a summary of the board’s implementation of the agreement. This agreements. With respect to the agreement entered into under s. 36.31 (2m) (bm), this subsection first applies to the report required under sub. (2) that applies to the 2014-15 2027-28 academic year.AB582,9Section 9. 38.12 (14) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:38.12 (14) (a) 1. The pupil has completed the 10th 8th grade.AB582,10Section 10. 38.12 (14) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:38.12 (14) (a) 3. The pupil notifies the school board of the school district in which the pupil resides of his or her intent to attend a technical college under this subsection by March May 1 if the pupil intends to enroll in the fall semester and, by October November 1 if the pupil intends to enroll in the spring semester, and by April 1 if the pupil intends to enroll in the summer semester or session.AB582,11Section 11. 38.12 (14) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:38.12 (14) (c) If a child attends a technical college under this subsection, the technical college shall ensure that the child’s educational program meets the high school graduation requirements under s. 118.33. At least 30 days before the beginning of the technical college semester or session in which the pupil will be enrolled, the school board of the school district in which the pupil resides shall notify the pupil, in writing, if a course in which the pupil will be enrolled does not meet the high school graduation requirements and whether the course is comparable to a course offered in the school district. If the pupil disagrees with the school board’s decision regarding comparability of courses or satisfaction of high school graduation requirements, the pupil may appeal the school board’s decision to the state superintendent within 30 days after the decision. The state superintendent’s decision is final and is not subject to review under subch. III of ch. 227. The pupil is eligible to receive both high school and technical college credit for courses successfully completed at the technical college.AB582,12Section 12. 38.12 (14) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:38.12 (14) (d) Subject to s. 118.55 (7t), for each pupil attending a technical college under this subsection, the school board shall pay to the technical college district board, in 2 installments payable upon initial enrollment and at the end of the semester or session, for those courses taken for high school credit, an amount equal to the cost of tuition, course fees, and books that a pupil who is attending the technical college and who is a resident of this state would be charged, except that the school board is not responsible for payment for any courses that are comparable to courses offered in the school district.AB582,13Section 13. Subchapter I (title) of chapter 106 [precedes 106.001] of the statutes is amended to read:CHAPTER 106SUBCHAPTER IAPPRENTICE AND DUALENROLLMENT PROGRAMSAB582,14Section 14. 106.08 of the statutes is created to read:106.08 Dual enrollment programs. (1) In this section:(a) “Council” means the council on dual enrollment.(b) “Dual enrollment program” means any program or course of study designed to provide high school pupils with the opportunity to gain credits in both high school and an institution of higher education, including transcripted credit programs or other educational services provided by contract between the governing body of a high school and an institution of higher education.(c) “Governing body of a high school” means any of the following:1. The school board of a school district that operates high school grades.2. The governing board of a charter school under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x) that operates high school grades.3. The governing body of a private school or tribal school that operates high school grades.(d) “Institution of higher education” has the meaning given in s. 39.395 (1), but also includes a tribally controlled college in this state.(2) (a) The council shall study and recommend methods of ensuring that all pupils and their families in this state have access to clear, affordable, and attainable pathways to college credit during high school. In doing so, the council shall prioritize promoting informed decision-making and facilitating seamless transitions for high school pupils into postsecondary education and the workforce. The council shall also endeavor to maximize the acceptance by institutions of higher education of course credit earned in high school. The council shall advise the department with respect to all of the council’s findings and recommendations.(b) The council shall meet at least annually to review and make recommendations regarding this state’s dual enrollment programs. (3) The department shall provide administrative support and assistance to the council, including staff, equipment, and office space, as necessary.(4) (a) The department shall, in consultation with the council, establish and maintain on the department’s website a portal dedicated to informing high school pupils and their families about the state’s dual enrollment programs.(b) As part of the information available on the portal under par. (a), the department shall include all of the following:1. Sufficient information for pupils and their families to apply to any dual enrollment program offered in this state. 2. Information regarding courses that may be taken under dual enrollment programs offered in this state.(c) The department shall update on the portal under par. (a), at least annually, the information specified in par. (b). Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab582 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab582 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB582 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB582 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB582: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting